Nevada, session 83, AB433.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Purple Ribbon Task Force on Firefighter
and Peace Officer Wellness is hereby created. The Task Force
consists of the following nine members:
(a) Two members appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate;
(b) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
(c) Three members appointed by the Governor;
(d) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly;
and
(e) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly.
2. To the extent practicable, membership of the Task Force
must include, without limitation:
(a) A representative from a local government;
(b) A representative of an employee organization, as defined in
NRS 288.040, that represents peace officers or a labor organization,
as defined in NRS 288.048, that represents peace officers;
(c) A resource officer with a behavioral health background;
(d) A representative from a state law enforcement agency,
including, without limitation, the Department of Public Safety or the
Department of Corrections; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(e) A representative of an employee organization, as defined in
NRS 288.040, that represents firefighters or a labor organization, as
defined in NRS 288.048, that represents firefighters.
3. The Task Force shall:
(a) Review the existing policies of this State concerning
personal wellness initiatives that account for the mental and physical
health of firefighters, peace officers and other law enforcement
personnel; and
(b) Recommend personal wellness initiatives for state and local
law enforcement agencies and fire departments.
4. The members of the Task Force serve without
compensation.
5. Each member of the Task Force who is an officer or
employee of the State or a local government must be relieved from
his or her duties without loss of regular compensation so that the
member may prepare for and attend meetings of the Task Force and
perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of the Task
Force in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or local
government shall not require an officer or employee who is a
member of the Task Force to make up the time the member is absent
from work to carry out his or her duties as a member, and shall not
require the member to take annual vacation or compensatory time
for the absence.
6. The Task Force shall, at its first meeting, elect a Chair and
Vice Chair from among its members.
7. The Task Force shall meet upon the call of the Chair or a
majority of the members of the Task Force.
8. A majority of the members of the Task Force constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at the meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Task Force.
9. The Task Force may apply for and accept any gift, donation,
bequest, grant or other source of money to carry out the duties of the
Task Force.
10. The Task Force shall prepare and submit a written report to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on Government Affairs
for the 84th Session of the Legislature. The report must include,
without limitation, a summary of the work and recommendations of
the Task Force.
Sec. 2. The members of the Purple Ribbon Task Force on
Firefighter and Peace Officer Wellness must be appointed pursuant
to section 1 of this act not later than October 1, 2025.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and expires
by limitation on June 30, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)